src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
naniġiaqtuqtuq ! is trapping
nanmaktuq ! carries on the back, back packs (N)
nanuktuq ! rubs with seal oil (as on neck for sore throat)
nanġaġaa   ! praises him, brags about him
nanġaqtuq ! brags, praises (himself)
nanġaqtuq ! praises, boasts
naparuq ! (4) rib (4)
naparuq ! sticks up
napaaqtuq ! tree
napaaqtuq ! tree, spruce tree
napittuq ! is snared
napituruq ! is noisy
napiŋaruq ! is hunchbacked (N)
nappairuq ! builds
napuŋaruq ! is hunchbacked (K)
naqittuq ! is low
narranŋuruq ! has abdominal ache
narranŋuruq ! stomach cramps (acute)
nasittuq ! ascends to a high spot for scanning (N)
natchikkaa ! yearns to follow him
natchiqiruq ! washes floor (K)
natchitchiġaa   ! lays flooring
natiġviksuq ! is ground drifting
natmaktuq ! carries on the back, back packs (K)
natqigutigaa ! forgives him (lit. corrects him) (K)
natqiksruqtuq ! is correcting one who has unknowingly erred
nauruq ! grows
naulikkaa ! spears it
nautchiiruq ! plants
nautkiaqtuq ! jumps down
naviagaa ! does not dare it
naviagigaa ! is dangerous for him
navianaqtuq ! is dangerous
naviktuq ! breaks
navikkaa ! breaks it
nayaaŋaġaa   ! greets him, sends him greetings (K)
nayagaqtuq ! is drowsy (N)
nayaŋaqtuq ! is drowsy
nayuġaa   ! lives with him, stays with him
nayuutiruq ! stays, remains
naġġugigaa ! despises it, rejects it
naŋiatchaktuq ! fears a situation
naŋittuq ! is sick
naŋittuq ! is sick (malaise)
niaqunŋuruq ! has a headache
nigaqtuq ! is snared
nigaqtuqtuq ! is snaring caribou or sheep
nigaqtuqtuq ! is snaring small game
niglaqtuq ! has cooled (of food, drink)
nigliñaqtuq ! is cold (not weather)
niguaqtuqtuq ! is wary (N)
nikatchaktuq ! gives up (N)
nikpaqtuq ! waits for an animal to appear (N)
niksaaqtuq ! burps (K)
niksiksuqtuq ! is hooking (jigging) fish
niksiḷiuqtuq ! makes a hook
niliqtuq ! expels flatus (gas)
nipaalaruq ! screams
nipiruq ! (sun, moon) sets
nipittuq ! is sticky
nipituruq ! is noisy, loud
niptaruq ! is bright weather (N)
niptaqtuq ! is clearing, clouds are dispersing
niqipialiuqtuq ! boils meat (K)
niqiqaqtuq ! has meat
niqiłuktuq ! is poor meat (food)
niqniaqtuq ! is cooking (K)
niuruq ! (sun, moon) appears from behind cloud
niuruq ! disembarks
niuriruq ! unloads
niuriruq ! unloads sled (K, N)
niuriruq ! unloads, longshores
nivaktuq ! paws (K)
nivaktuq ! shovels, digs
nivaktaqtuq ! falls backward (N)
niviqtuq ! lays on his back (K)
niviŋaġaa   ! hangs it up
niviŋaqtuq ! hangs down
niñŋiqsimaruq ! is insulating dwelling by building a wall of snow blocks about it and placing soft snow between the wall and the dwelling
niġiruq ! eats
niġianiktuq ! has already eaten
niġiaqtuq ! is going to eat
niġipchaġaa   ! he feeds him
niġiqsuruq ! like to eat excessively (N)
niġiraksrauruq ! must be eaten
niġiruksrauruq ! has to eat
niġisuktuq ! is hungry (K)
niġisuġuiqsuq ! has had enough food
niġiugigaa ! expects him (K, N)
niġiuktuq ! expects, hopes (N)
niġiľauraqtuq ! is eating a little
niġḷiktuq ! choked to death
niġvallaksraaqtuq ! falls backward (K)
niŋitkaa ! kuvraq is setting net
niŋitchiruq ! sets out, plants
nuiruq ! comes into view, rises (sun)
nuktaqtuq ! moves from place to place
nullaqtuq ! camps
nullautchiġñaqsiruq ! is supper time
nunagiksuq ! is a good land
nunuuraqtuq ! is remorseful
nuqitkaa ! draws, pulls it
nuqitchiruq ! raises an object by pulling with a rope
nutauruq ! is new
nutiktuq ! leaps
nutqaqtuq ! stops, dies
nutqaqtitkaa ! stops it
nuttaġigaa ! leaps at him
nuuruq ! moves to another dwelling
nuuttuq ! moves to another dwelling
nuvaktuq ! has a cold
nuvaksiruq ! has a cold
nuviyaliqsuq ! is overcast, is getting cloudy
nuvuyalaqtuq ! is cloudy (broken)
nuvuyaliqsuq ! is overcast, is getting cloudy
nuvuyaŋŋuqsaiññaġaa   ! is changing to cloudy weather
nuyuaqtuq ! is wary (K)
nuyuiqsuq ! is not afraid, is not scared
nuŋuruq ! is used up
paaġaa   ! meets him
paalaktuq ! stumbles, falls forward
paamaktuq ! crawls on all fours
paamġuqtuq ! crawls
paaġurraqtuq ! paddles (qayaq)
pairuq ! stays behind, stays home (when others went on a journey)
paitchaktuq ! inherits (K)
pakaktuq ! searches
pakiktuq ! searches (K)
paniktuq ! is thin, skinny
paniqtuq ! is dry
pannauruq ! is thin, skinny
paqittuq ! finds
pasigaa ! blames him, accuses him (N)
pasiaqtuq ! warms himself by the fire
pasigigaa ! suspects him, blames him
pasinaqtuq ! is guilty
pasrigaa ! blames him, accuses him (K)
pasrigigaa ! suspects him, blames him (K)
patchisaiġaa   ! frees him
patchisaiqsauruq ! is not guilty, innocent
patchisauruq ! is guilty
patchisigigaa ! accused, blamed him, condemns him, finds him guilty
patchisigigaa ! blames him, accuses him (K)
patiktuq ! slaps
pauŋaqtuq ! travels inland
payuktaqtuq ! gives gift of food
paġlaġaa   ! welcomes him
pałuqtuq ! capsizes (K)
paŋaliktuq ! gallops
piaptuq ! sloppy (n)
pigaaqtuq ! stays up late
pigiitḷuktuq ! it is worse
piiġaa   ! removes it
piiguqtuq ! forgets
piiḷaaqtuq ! denies
piiqsuq ! is absent
piiqsuq ! is taken away
piiyaġaa   ! breaks it
piiyaqtuq ! is broken
piksraqtaaġigaa ! is choosing him
piksraqtaaġuruq ! chooses (N)
piksrutitaqtuq ! shovels
piḷaaqtuq ! cares for baby
piḷaiqsuq ! is tired
piḷaiqsuq ! is tired (N)
piḷaiŋiaqsiaqtuq ! takes a rest (a break from work)
piḷaktuq ! butchers an animal (performs surgery)
piḷiuqtuq ! is making
piḷḷaruq ! is able to do (N)
piḷḷuataqtuq ! is dependable, is good (N)
piḷḷuataqtuq ! is good, dependable
piḷuiḷḷiqsuq ! is not as capable as used to be
piḷuktuq ! is bad (N)
piḷuktuq ! is bad, sins (N)
piḷuktuq ! sinned (N)
piḷuksisuguuruq ! is always wanting to do badly
piḷġaġaa   ! braids hair
piḷġataqtuq ! finally he did it
pimaqłuktuq ! is bad
pimmaġiksaaqtuq ! does it well
piqpagigaa ! loves him
piqpaktuq ! is expensive, precious, valuable
piqpaksriruq ! loves
piqpaksriruq ! loves, precious
piqsiqsuq ! is snow storming (b)
pisaasruktuq ! is always trying to do (K)
pisaasruktuq ! is clever (K)
pisaasuqtuq ! is clever (N)
pisaasuuruq ! is always trying to do (N)
pisaayugaġaa   ! provokes him
pisikkaa ! shoots it, hits it (N)
pisiksaqtuq ! tries to shoot, tries to hit (N)
pisruktuq ! walks (K)
pisuaqtuq ! walks
pisuaqtuq ! walks (N)
pisuktuq ! flees
pisuktuq ! wants, desires
pisukataqtuq ! takes a stroll
pisuġiuqsuq ! is enough (as when filling gas tank)
pitḷaruq ! is able to do (K)
pitḷautaqtuq ! is dependable, is good
pitquruq ! commands
pituktuq ! ties up (as a dog to a pole)
pitukkaa ! ties it, (dog, boat)
pitukkaa ! ties up, anchors
piuraaqtuq ! plays, fools around
pivuittaqtuq ! loves (of marriage) (N)
piyaqquqtuq ! had an accident
piyuaġaa   ! tempts him, pursues him
piñaqtuq ! happened
piñiaqtuq ! will do, happen
piñiġliruq ! inadvertently startles animal
piññaqnaqtuq ! is good-looking, beautiful (K)
piññaqnaqtuq ! is pretty
piññaġiaqtuq ! is early
piġuqtuq ! is haughty (N)
piŋŋuaqtuq ! is pretending
piŋŋuaqtuq ! pretends
puggutchiruq ! washes dishes (N)
puggutchiqiruq ! washes dishes (K)
puiruq ! surfaces
puktaktuq ! stinker (dead animal floating after having first sunk) (q)
puktuktuq ! stinker (dead animal floating after having first sunk) (N)
pularuq ! is eclipsed (lit. slipped into the brush)
punniliuqtuq ! bakes bread (N)
punŋaruq ! bows low, hides from animal while stalking (used for non-appearance of sun in December) (K)
puptaruq ! floats
puptaktuq ! stinker (dead animal floating after having first sunk) (K)
puqiksuq ! is quick to learn, is wise (K)
puttuq ! bows
puttuq ! bows, bends at the waist
putchimaallaktitchaġaa   ! stores moistened skin for short while
putchimaapkaqsaaġaa   ! stores moistened skin overnight
puttuqsriruq ! comes to mind, is inspired (N)
puturiruq ! made a hole, drilled a hole
putyukkaa ! pinches it (K)
puuguqtuq ! forgets (p)
puukaqtuq ! stumbles
puuvraaqtuq ! plays in water
puuvraktuq ! swims, plows through deep soft snow (N)
puuvraqtuq ! swims (human swimming only)
puuvruktuq ! swims, plows through deep soft snow (K)
puuyuqtuq ! forgets (K)
puuġniġaa   ! wraps it
puyattuq ! is dirty, grimy, gummy
puyauruq ! is soiled, (e.g. of unwashed clothes)
puyuaqtuq ! stalks (K)
puyugaktuq ! is approaching a sea mammal by crawling (N)
puyyukkaa ! pinches it (N)
qaaktuqtuq ! is seining
qaaliqsiruq ! roofs a house
qaamasraaqtuq ! is buoyantly joyful (K)
qaamatchaktuq ! is buoyantly joyful (N)
qaaqtuq ! bursts, explodes (N)
qaaqsiñiiraulġataqtuq ! readily blows his top (K)
qaayuliqsuq ! dirties himself (of baby messing diaper)
qaaŋaniittuq ! is on top
qaaŋiałausrimaruq ! veers away, goes to excess (K)
qairuq ! comes (N)
qairuq ! comes (n)
qaiḷiqsuq ! is rough water
qaiqsuq ! is smooth, level, flat
qaisugnaġniqsuq ! is thought he is coming (I think he is coming
qaitchiruq ! gives
qaitchigaa ! gives it
qaiyasiruq ! is about to come
qaiyumaaqtuq ! will come (someday)
qakiġaa   ! boxes him
qaliuqtuq ! cooks fish (K)
qalliruq ! approaches, nears
qalligaa ! draws near
qallugauraqiruq ! washes dishes (N)
qaluruq ! is dip netting
qalugaa ! is dip netting
qaluktuq ! catches a fish (K)
qaluuqtuq ! is dip netting
qaluŋniaqtuq ! is fishing (K)
qalġuqtuq ! croaks, crows, quacks, honks, whistles
qamiruq ! goes out, extinguishes itself
qamittuq ! is turned off, extinguished
qamitkaa ! turns it off, extinguishes it
qamŋuiruq ! snores (N, K)
qanigruaqtuq ! is snowing (no wind) (K)
qanittuq ! is near
qanittuq ! is near, is close
qanniġaa   ! orders it
qanniksuq ! is snowing (no wind) (N)
qapiktuq ! is discouraged
qapiqtaiḷiluuruq ! argues heatedly
qapiqtaiḷisuuruq ! argues incessantly
qapiŋaisaaġaa   ! encourages him
qapiŋaisaaqtuq ! encourages
qaqqiruq ! bakes bread (K)
qaqquġaa   ! cracks it
qaqquqtuq ! crunches, cracks
qaquaġlaaġnaqtuq ! is tense because of impending unpleasantness (N)
qaqugauġlaaqtuq ! is tense because of impending unpleasantness (K)
qarvaktuq ! fleshes sea mammal (and polar bear), tans (N)
qasraqtuq ! bell rings (K)
qasruruq ! is withered (K)
qasruqtuq ! ends, quits, stops, is satisfied (K)
qasuiruq ! meet (by chance) while travelling
qasuutiruq ! meets, rendezvous
qasuŋaruq ! is withered (N)
qatchaqtuqtuq ! is knocking
qatchaqtuqtuq ! knocks, is knocking
qatiqtuq ! is white
qatmiksuq ! is impatient, dislikes to wait (K)
qatvaktuq ! fleshes sea mammal (and polar bear), tans (K)
qaummaiḷiqsuq ! is lightning
qaummaqtuq ! clear, translucent, light enough to see
qaummaġiksuq ! is bright
qaunagigaa ! cares for him
qaunaksriruq ! cares
qauriaqtuq ! rests
qaurimmiaqtuq ! fainted (N)
qauġriruq ! becomes conscious
qauġriliqtuq ! catches on (K)
qavaqtuq ! sleeps on back in water (N, q)
qavaqtuq ! to sleep on back in water (of seal)
qaviuġnaqsauruq ! glamorous, seductive
qaġanaqtuq ! is easy (K)
qaġanaqtuq ! is easy, not difficult (K)
qaġanatluktuq ! it is easier
qiaruq ! cries
qiallaktuq ! cries much
qiarraqsiruq ! starts to cry (N)
qiatuqtuq ! intestine that is turned inside out, cleaned and eaten
qiayaqsiruq ! starts to cry (K)
qichaqtuq ! stand upright (K)
qigluktuq ! is saddened about a loss
qigluktuq ! sorrows, mourns
qiiqsruktuq ! has convulsions, is an epileptic
qiiyanaqtuq ! is cold
qikisitkaa ! warps it
qikiŋaruq ! is warped
qiksiksraqtuq ! respects, fear of a person who is not well known (N)
qiluruq ! has a muscle cramp
qiluriruq ! has a muscle cramp
qiḷaruq ! conjures, divines
qiḷiqtuq ! ties a knot
qiḷuktuq ! barks (dog, fox)
qimaktuq ! escapes, flees
qimuktuq ! pulls
qimuktuq ! pulls (of an animal)
qinnaktuq ! fights, plays roughly
qinnaktuq ! is angry
qinuruq ! slush ice is forming, floating downstream
qipigaa ! twists it
qipiġniuqtuq ! desires
qipiŋaruq ! is twisted
qipriruq ! twists sinew, makes thread (K)
qiqittuq ! is frozen (part of body)
qiqitigaa ! freezes it quickly, has frostbite
qiqsrauruq ! is frozen (not of body) (K)
qiqumaruq ! is frozen (not of body) (N)
qirriuqtuq ! chops fire wood
qiruksiruq ! carries wood inside
qiruktaqtuq ! is going for wood
qitchuktuq ! scratches
qitchuktiġaa   ! scratches it
qitiqaqtuq ! noon (lit. has middle)
qitiqqutchiġnaqsiruq ! is lunch time (noon meal) (N, q)
qituttuq ! is soft, flexible
